Illinois, session 104th, SB2605.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:   4    Section 5. The sum of $847,900, or so much of that sum as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Judicial Inquiry Board for its ordinary and 7contingent expenses. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92025.